Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.560

Financial institution service providers—Power of director—Rule making.

The director has the power, and broad administrative discretion, to administer and interpret RCW 43.320.500 through 43.320.550. The director may adopt all rules necessary to administer RCW 43.320.500 through 43.320.550.

[ 2022 c 49 s 7.]